Utah statutes.
53-11-108.   Licensure -- Basic qualifications.

An applicant for licensure under this chapter shall meet the following qualifications:

(1)  An applicant shall be:

(a)  at least 21 years of age;

(b)  a citizen or legal resident of the United States; and

(c)  of good moral character.

(2)  An applicant may not:

(a)  have been convicted of:

(i)  a felony;

(ii)  any act involving illegally using, carrying, or possessing a dangerous weapon;

(iii)  any act of personal violence or force on any person or convicted of threatening to commit any act of personal violence or force against another person;

(iv)  any act constituting dishonesty or fraud;

(v)  impersonating a peace officer; or

(vi)  any act involving moral turpitude;

(b)  be on probation, parole, community supervision, or named in an outstanding arrest warrant; or

(c)  be employed as a peace officer.

(3)  If previously or currently licensed in another state or jurisdiction, the applicant shall be in good standing within that state or jurisdiction.

(4) (a)  The applicant shall also have completed a training program of not less than 16 hours that is approved by the board and includes:

(i)  instruction on the duties and responsibilities of a licensee under this chapter, including:

(A)  search, seizure, and arrest procedure;

(B)  pursuit, arrest, detainment, and transportation of a bail bond suspect; and

(C)  specific duties and responsibilities regarding entering an occupied structure to carry out functions under this chapter;

(ii)  the laws and rules relating to the bail bond business;

(iii)  the rights of the accused; and

(iv)  ethics.

(b)  The program may be completed after the licensure application is submitted, but shall be completed before a license may be issued under this chapter.

(5)  If the applicant desires to carry a firearm as a licensee, the applicant shall:

(a)  successfully complete a course regarding the specified types of weapons he plans to carry.  The course shall:

(i)  be not less than 16 hours;

(ii)  be conducted by any national, state, or local firearms training organization approved by the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division created in Section 53-10-103; and

(iii)  provide training regarding general familiarity with the types of firearms to be carried, including:

(A)  the safe loading, unloading, storage, and carrying of the types of firearms to be concealed; and

(B)  current laws defining lawful use of a firearm by a private citizen, including lawful self-defense, use of deadly force, transportation, and concealment; and

(b)  shall hold a valid license to carry a concealed weapon, issued under Section 53-5-704.

